Idaho, session 2026, H0884.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That the Heading for Chapter 57, Title 39, Idaho Code, be,
and the same is hereby amended to read as follows:
CHAPTER 57
PREVENTION OF MINORS' ACCESS TO ALTERNATIVE NICOTINE PRODUCTS, TOBACCO
PRODUCTS, OR ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES
SECTION 2. That Section 39-5702, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-5702. DEFINITIONS. The terms used in this chapter are defined as
follows:
(1) "Alternative nicotine product" means a noncombustible product
that contains nicotine or a nicotine analog, whether natural or synthetic,
but does not contain tobacco and is intended for human consumption, whether
chewed, absorbed, dissolved, ingested, or by other means. This term shall
not include a vapor product, tobacco product, or any product regulated by the
United States food and drug administration under chapter V of the federal
food, drug, and cosmetic act.
(1) (2) "Business" means any company, partnership, firm, sole propri-
etorship, association, corporation, organization, or other legal entity, or
a representative of the foregoing entities.
(2) (3) "Delivery sale" means to distribute tobacco products or elec-
tronic smoking devices to a consumer in a state where either:
(a) The individual submits the order for such sale by means of a
telephonic or other method of voice transmission, data transfer via
computer networks, including the internet and other online services, or
facsimile, or the mails; or
(b) The tobacco products or electronic smoking devices are delivered by
use of the mails or a delivery service.
(3) (4) "Delivery service" means any person who is engaged in the com-
mercial delivery of letters, packages or other containers.


(4) (5) "Department" means the state department of health and welfare
or its duly authorized representative.
(5) (6) "Distribute" means to give, deliver, sell, offer to give, offer
to deliver, offer to sell or cause any person to do the same or hire any person
to do the same.
(7) "Distributor" means:
(a) Any person engaged in the business of selling alternative nicotine
products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices in this state
who brings, or causes to be brought, into this state from outside the
state any such products for sale;
(b) Any person who makes, manufactures, or fabricates alternative
nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices in
this state for sale in this state; and
(c) Any person engaged in the business of selling alternative nicotine
products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices outside this
state who ships or transports such products to retailers in this state
to be sold by those retailers.
(8) "Electronic smoking device" means any nonlighted, noncombustible
product that employs a mechanical heating element, battery, or electronic
circuit regardless of shape or size and that can be used to produce vapor
from nicotine or a nicotine analog, however derived, in a solution. The term
includes any vapor cartridge or other container of nicotine in a solution or
other form that is intended to be used with or in an electronic cigarette,
electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or similar product
or device. The term does not include any product regulated by the United
States food and drug administration under chapter V of the federal food,
drug, and cosmetic act.
(6) (9) "Location" means the street address where tobacco or electronic
smoking device products are sold or the uniform resource locator for retail-
ers who sell tobacco or electronic smoking products exclusively via the in-
ternet.
(10) "Manufacturer" means a person who manufactures and sells alterna-
tive nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices.
(7) (11) "Minor" means a person under twenty-one (21) years of age.
(8) (12) "Minor-exempt permit" means a permittee location whose rev-
enues from the sale of alcoholic beverages for on-site consumption comprises
at least fifty-five percent (55%) of total revenues, or whose products and
services are primarily obscene, pornographic, profane, or sexually ori-
ented, is exempt from inspections assisted by a minor, if minors are not
allowed in the location and such prohibition is posted clearly on all en-
trance doors.
(13)(a) "Nicotine analog" means a substance:
(i) The chemical structure of which is substantially similar to
the chemical structure of nicotine; or
(ii) That has, purports to have, or is represented to have, an ef-
fect on the central nervous system that is similar to or greater
than the effect on the central nervous system as nicotine.
(b) Factors relevant to determining whether a substance is a nicotine
analog include but are not limited to the marketing, advertising, and
labeling of the substance and whether the substance has been manufac-


tured, formulated, sold, distributed, or marketed with the intent to
avoid the provisions of this chapter and other provisions of law.
(9) (14) "Permit" means a permit issued by the department for the sale or
distribution of tobacco products or electronic smoking devices.
(10) (15) "Permit endorsement" means a sale or delivery method used by
the permittee to sell tobacco or electronic smoking device products, includ-
ing delivery sales, delivery service, and direct sales.
(11) (16) "Permittee" means the holder of a valid permit for the sale or
distribution of tobacco products or electronic smoking devices.
(12) (17) "Photographic identification" means state, district, terri-
torial, possession, provincial, national or other equivalent government
driver's license, identification card or military card, in all cases bearing
a photograph and a date of birth, or a valid passport.
(13) (18) "Random, unannounced inspection" means an inspection of re-
tail outlets by a law enforcement agency or by the department, with or with-
out the assistance of a minor, to monitor compliance of this chapter.
(19) "Retailer" means any person engaged in the business of selling
alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking de-
vices to ultimate consumers.
(14) (20) "Seller" means the person who physically sells or distributes
tobacco products or electronic smoking devices.
(15) (21)(a) "Tobacco product or electronic smoking device" means:
(i) Any substance containing, made of, or derived from tobacco
or nicotine that is intended for human consumption or is likely to
be consumed, whether inhaled, absorbed, or ingested by any other
means, including but not limited to cigarettes, cigars, pipes,
snuff, smoking or chewing tobacco, snus, tobacco papers, or smoke-
less tobacco; or
(ii) Any electronic smoking device that may be used to deliver an
aerosolized or a vaporized substance to the person inhaling from
the device, including but not limited to an electronic cigarette,
an electronic cigar, an electronic pipe, a vape pen, or an elec-
tronic hookah, or any component, part, or accessory of such a
device, or any substance intended to be aerosolized or vaporized
during use of the device, whether or not the substance contains
nicotine, or any heated or lighted device intended to be used for
inhalation; or
(iii) (ii) Any components, parts, or accessories of a tobacco
product or an electronic smoking device, whether or not they con-
tain tobacco or nicotine, including but not limited to filters,
rolling papers, blunt or hemp wraps, and pipes, whether manufac-
tured, distributed, marketed, or sold as an electronic cigarette,
electronic cigar, electronic hookah, or vape pen, or under any
other product name or descriptor.
(b) The term "tobacco product or electronic smoking device" does not
include alternative nicotine products or drugs, devices, or combina-
tions of products authorized for sale by the United States food and drug
administration as those terms are defined in the federal food, drug, and
cosmetic act.


(16) (22) "Vending machine" means any mechanical, electronic, or other
similar device that, upon the insertion of tokens, money or any other form of
payment, dispenses tobacco products or electronic smoking devices.
(17) (23) "Vendor-assisted sales" means any sale or distribution in
which the customer has no access to the product except through the assistance
of the seller.
(18) (24) "Without a permit" means a business that has failed to obtain a
permit or a business whose permit is suspended or revoked.
SECTION 3. That Section 39-5703, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-5703. POSSESSION, DISTRIBUTION, OR USE BY A MINOR. (1) It shall
be unlawful for a minor to possess, receive, purchase, use, or consume
alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking de-
vices or to attempt any of the foregoing.
(2) It shall be unlawful for a minor to sell or distribute alternative
nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices or to at-
tempt either of the foregoing.
(3) It shall be unlawful for a minor to provide false identification
or make any false statement regarding their age in an attempt to obtain
alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking de-
vices.
(4) A minor who is assisting with a random unannounced inspection in ac-
cordance with this chapter shall not be in violation of this chapter.
(5) A minor may possess but not sell or distribute alternative nico-
tine products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices in the course
of employment, for duties such as stocking shelves or carrying purchases to
customers' vehicles.
(6) Penalties for violations by a minor. A violation of subsection (1)
of this section by a minor shall constitute an infraction and shall be pun-
ishable by a fine of seventeen dollars and fifty cents ($17.50). The first
violation of subsection (2) or (3) of this section by a minor shall consti-
tute an infraction and shall be punishable by a fine of two hundred dollars
($200). A subsequent violation of subsection (2) or (3) of this section by a
minor shall constitute a misdemeanor and shall be punishable by imprisonment
in an appropriate facility not exceeding thirty (30) days, a fine not exceed-
ing three hundred dollars ($300), or both such fine and imprisonment. The
court may, in addition to the penalties provided in this section, require the
minor and, if the minor is under eighteen (18) years of age, the minor's par-
ents or legal guardian to attend alternative nicotine product, tobacco prod-
uct, or and electronic smoking device awareness programs or to perform com-
munity service in programs related to alternative nicotine product, tobacco
product, or and electronic smoking device awareness.
SECTION 4. That Section 39-5704, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-5704. PERMITTING OF ALTERNATIVE NICOTINE PRODUCTS, TOBACCO PROD-
UCTS, OR AND ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES RETAILERS. (1) It shall be unlawful
to sell or distribute or offer alternative nicotine products, tobacco prod-


ucts, or electronic smoking devices for sale or distribution at retail or
to possess alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic
smoking devices with the intention of selling at retail without having first
obtained a tobacco product or electronic smoking device permit from the
department, which shall be the only retail alternative nicotine products,
tobacco product, or electronic smoking device permit or license required.
Provided however, this section shall not be deemed to require a wholesaler
or manufacturer's representative or employees who, in the course of their
employment, stock shelves and replenish alternative nicotine products,
tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices at a permittee's place of
business to obtain a permit.
(2) The department shall administer the permitting of alternative
nicotine product, tobacco product, or electronic smoking device retailers
and shall be authorized to ensure compliance with this chapter.
(3) Permits shall be issued annually for each permanent business loca-
tion to ensure compliance with the requirements of this chapter. A copy of
signage required by this chapter, and any other materials deemed necessary
shall be provided with each permit issued.
(4) A separate permit must be obtained for each place of business and is
nontransferable to another person, business, or location.
(5) The applicant shall select one (1) or more permit endorsements and
make the permit available upon request.
(6) A permittee may display a sign in each location within a place of
business where alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or elec-
tronic smoking devices are sold or distributed. A sign may be clearly
visible to the customer and the seller and shall state: "STATE LAW PROHIBITS
THE SALE OF ALTERNATIVE NICOTINE PRODUCTS, TOBACCO PRODUCTS, OR ELECTRONIC
SMOKING DEVICES TO PERSONS UNDER THE AGE OF TWENTY-ONE (21) YEARS. PROOF OF
AGE REQUIRED. ANYONE WHO SELLS OR DISTRIBUTES ALTERNATIVE NICOTINE PROD-
UCTS, TOBACCO PRODUCTS, OR ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES TO A PERSON UNDER
THE AGE OF TWENTY-ONE (21) YEARS IS SUBJECT TO STRICT FINES AND PENALTIES.
PERSONS UNDER THE AGE OF TWENTY-ONE (21) YEARS ARE SUBJECT TO FINES AND
PENALTIES."
(7) Permittees are responsible to educate employees as to the require-
ments of this chapter and retain forms signed by each employee stating that
the employee understands such requirements.
(8) It shall be unlawful for the permittee to allow employees who are
minors to sell or distribute alternative nicotine products, tobacco prod-
ucts, or electronic smoking devices, except as provided in this subsection.
Employees who are minors may possess but not sell or distribute alternative
nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices in the
course of employment, for such duties as stocking shelves or carrying pur-
chases to customers' vehicles, and employees who are eighteen (18) years
to twenty (20) years of age may sell or distribute alternative nicotine
products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices in the course and
scope of their employment.
(9) A permit shall be closed when the permittee closes the business, no
longer sells alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic
smoking device products devices, moves to a different physical location, or
sells the business.


(10) A permit shall be revoked when it is determined that a permit was
fraudulently obtained to avoid penalties on an existing permit.
(11) All permits expire annually at midnight on December 31 unless re-
newed. The department shall mail notice of renewal for permits at least
ninety (90) days prior to expiration.
(12) The department may deny an application and refuse to issue or renew
a permit or may suspend or revoke a permit issued to any person, partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, or business trust upon determining
that the licensee or the principals or managers at the permitted location of
the applicant or permittee have been:
(a) Found guilty of any fraud or misrepresentation in connection with
an application filed pursuant to this section;
(b) Convicted of robbery, extortion, burglary, larceny, embezzlement,
fraudulent conversion, gambling, perjury, bribery, treason, tax eva-
sion, or racketeering; or
(c) Convicted of a felony within the last five (5) years.
(13) The department may deny an application and refuse to issue or renew
a permit if there is a reasonable basis to determine the application is filed
by a person as subterfuge for a different party of interest whose permit has
previously been denied, canceled, or revoked for cause or a violation under
this chapter.
SECTION 5. That Chapter 57, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-5704A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-5704A. SALES BETWEEN PERMITTED PERSONS OR ENTITIES ONLY. (1) Dis-
tributors and retailers shall purchase alternative nicotine products, to-
bacco products, and electronic smoking devices only from a manufacturer or
distributor who has obtained a permit under chapter 25, title 63, Idaho Code,
and shall verify that such seller holds a valid permit before making a pur-
chase.
(2) Manufacturers and distributors shall sell alternative nicotine
products, tobacco products, and electronic smoking devices only to a dis-
tributor or retailer who has obtained a permit under this chapter or chapter
25, title 63, Idaho Code, and shall verify that the purchaser holds a valid
permit before making a sale.
SECTION 6. That Chapter 57, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-5704B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-5704B. PERMITTING OF MANUFACTURERS OF ALTERNATIVE NICOTINE PROD-
UCTS, TOBACCO PRODUCTS, AND ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES. (1) Every manufac-
turer of alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, and electronic
smoking devices that are sold in this state, whether directly or through a
distributor, retailer, or similar intermediary shall obtain from the de-
partment a manufacturer permit. A manufacturer of alternative nicotine
products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices that already
holds a wholesaler or distributor permit shall also separately obtain a man-
ufacturer permit. The permit is nontransferable.


(2) Each application for a manufacturer permit shall be accompanied by
such information as the department may require for the purpose of adminis-
tering this chapter, and by a one-time fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).
(3) A person or entity that obtains a permit under this chapter has es-
tablished minimum contacts with the state and consents to the exercise of
personal jurisdiction over the person or entity in the courts of this state
in any matter or issue arising under this chapter or related to the sale or
distribution of alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, and elec-
tronic smoking devices.
(4) The department shall maintain a website that identifies all per-
mitted entities, including information regarding permits that have been re-
voked or suspended.
SECTION 7. That Chapter 57, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-5704C, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-5704C. AGENT FOR SERVICE OF PROCESS. (1) Any nonresident or foreign
manufacturer of electronic smoking devices that has not registered to do
business in this state as a foreign corporation or business entity shall,
as a condition to receiving an electronic smoking device permit under this
chapter, appoint and continually engage without interruption the services
of an agent in this state to act as agent for the service of process on whom
all process, and any action or proceeding against such manufacturer con-
cerning or arising out of the enforcement of this chapter, may be served in
any manner authorized by law. Such service shall constitute legal and valid
service of process on the manufacturer. The manufacturer shall provide the
name, address, telephone number, and proof of the appointment and availabil-
ity of such agent to the department.
(2) The electronic smoking device manufacturer shall provide notice to
the department thirty (30) calendar days prior to termination of the author-
ity of an agent and shall further provide proof to the satisfaction of the
department of the appointment of a new agent no less than five (5) calendar
days prior to the termination of an existing agent appointment. In the event
an agent terminates an agency appointment, the manufacturer shall notify the
department of the termination within five (5) calendar days and shall in-
clude proof to the satisfaction of the department of the appointment of a new
agent.
(3) Any electronic smoking device manufacturer whose products are
sold in this state without appointing or designating an agent as required
in this section shall be deemed to have appointed the secretary of state as
such agent and may be proceeded against in courts of this state by service of
process upon the secretary of state; however, the appointment of the secre-
tary of state as such agent shall not satisfy the condition for obtaining an
electronic smoking device manufacturer permit.
SECTION 8. That Chapter 57, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-5704D, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:


39-5704D. BOND REQUIREMENT FOR NONRESIDENT OR FOREIGN MANUFACTURERS
OF ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES. (1) Any nonresident or foreign manufacturer
of electronic smoking devices that has not registered to do business in
the state as a foreign corporation or business entity shall, as a condition
precedent to receiving an electronic smoking device permit, submit to the
department a surety bond or other cash security payable to the state in the
amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). The bond shall be posted
by a corporate surety located within the United States. Whenever it is the
opinion of the department that the bond given by a permittee is inadequate
in amount to fully protect the state, the department shall require an addi-
tional bond in such amount as the department deems sufficient.
(2) The bond shall be conditioned on the performance by the electronic
smoking device manufacturer of all requirements and obligations imposed by
this section. A surety on a manufacturer's bond shall be liable up to the
amount of the bond, and the state may execute on such surety bond for the pay-
ment of fines and penalties imposed on the manufacturer under this chapter
and for the costs of seizure and destruction of products sold in violation of
this chapter. If the state executes on the surety bond, it may require the
manufacturer to provide an additional bond as a condition precedent for re-
taining the electronic smoking device manufacturer permit.
(3) A surety on a bond furnished by an electronic smoking device manu-
facturer as provided in this section shall be released and discharged from
liability to the state accruing on the bond after expiration of sixty (60)
days from the date upon which such surety lodges with the department a writ-
ten request to be released and discharged. This provision shall not operate
to relieve, release, or discharge the surety from liability already accrued
or that accrues before the expiration of the sixty (60) day period. The de-
partment shall, upon receiving any such request, notify the manufacturer who
furnished the bond. Unless the manufacturer, on or before the expiration
of the sixty (60) day period, files with the department a new bond, with the
surety approved by and acceptable to the department, the department shall
cancel the manufacturer's electronic smoking device manufacturer permit.
SECTION 9. That Chapter 57, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-5704E, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-5704E. PENALTIES. (1) Any person who violates any of the provisions
of sections 39-5704A through 39-5704D, Idaho Code, shall be subject to the
following penalties:
(a) In the case of a first violation, a fine of five hundred dollars
($500) per product purchased, sold, or manufactured in violation of
such sections.
(b) In the case of a second violation in a two (2) year period, a fine of
one thousand dollars ($1,000) per product purchased, sold, or manufac-
tured in violation of such sections, and if the violator holds a permit,
the permit shall be suspended for seven (7) days.
(c) In the case of a third violation in a two (2) year period, a fine of
two thousand dollars ($2,000) per product purchased, sold, or manufac-
tured in violation of such sections, and if the violator holds a permit,
the permit shall be suspended for thirty (30) days.


(d) In the case of a fourth violation in a two (2) year period, a fine of
five thousand dollars ($5,000) per product purchased, sold, or manufac-
tured in violation of such sections, and if the violator holds a permit,
the permit shall be revoked.
(2) A second or subsequent violation of the provisions of sections
39-5704A through 39-5704D, Idaho Code, constitutes an unfair and deceptive
act or practice pursuant to chapter 6, title 48, Idaho Code.
(3) Any electronic smoking devices offered for sale in violation of the
provisions of this chapter are hereby declared to be contraband goods and
may be seized by the department or an employee of the department, or by any
peace officer when directed by the department, without a warrant. Said elec-
tronic smoking devices seized shall be destroyed or otherwise permanently
disposed of and shall not be subject to resale. Fifteen (15) days' notice of
the destruction or disposal shall be given. The cost of such seizure and de-
struction or disposal shall be borne by the person from whom the products are
seized.
SECTION 10. That Section 39-5705, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-5705. SALE OR DISTRIBUTION OF ALTERNATIVE NICOTINE PRODUCTS, TO-
BACCO PRODUCTS, OR ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES TO A MINOR. (1) It shall be un-
lawful to sell, distribute, or offer alternative nicotine products, tobacco
products, or electronic smoking devices to a minor.
(2) It shall be an affirmative defense that the seller of an alternative
nicotine product, a tobacco product, or an electronic smoking device to a mi-
nor in violation of this section had requested, examined, and reasonably re-
lied upon a photographic identification from such person establishing that
the person is at least twenty-one (21) years of age prior to selling such
person an alternative nicotine product, a tobacco product, or an electronic
smoking device. The failure of a seller to request and examine photographic
identification from a person under twenty-one (21) years of age prior to the
sale of an alternative nicotine product, a tobacco product, or an electronic
smoking device to such person shall be construed against the seller and form
a conclusive basis for the seller's violation of this section.
SECTION 11. That Section 39-5706, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-5706. VENDOR-ASSISTED SALES. (1) It shall be unlawful to sell or
distribute alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic
smoking devices by any means other than vendor-assisted sales where the
customer has no access to the product except through the assistance of the
seller.
(2) It shall be unlawful to sell or distribute alternative nicotine
products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices from vending ma-
chines or self-service displays.
(3) Stores with alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or
electronic smoking devices comprising at least seventy-five percent (75%)
of total merchandise are exempt from requiring vendor-assisted sales if mi-


nors are not allowed in the store and such prohibition is posted clearly on
all entrance doors.
SECTION 12. That Section 39-5707, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-5707. OPENED PACKAGES AND SAMPLES. (1) It shall be unlawful to sell
or distribute alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or elec-
tronic smoking devices for commercial purposes other than in the federally
required sealed package provided by the manufacturer with all the required
warning labels and health warnings.
(2) It shall be unlawful to sell or distribute alternative nicotine
products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices for free or below
the cost of such products to the sellers or distributors of the products for
commercial or promotional purposes to members of the general public in pub-
lic places or at public events.
SECTION 13. That Section 39-5708, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-5708. CIVIL PENALTIES FOR VIOLATIONS OF PERMIT. (1) Any permittee
who fails to comply with any part of this chapter regarding the sale or dis-
tribution of alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic
smoking devices shall be subject to a civil penalty as provided in this sec-
tion or have their permit suspended, pursuant to compliance with the con-
tested case provisions of the Idaho administrative procedure act, chapter
52, title 67, Idaho Code, or both.
(2) If a seller who is not a permittee violates section 39-5705, Idaho
Code, and sells or distributes alternative nicotine products, tobacco prod-
ucts, or electronic smoking devices to a minor, then the seller shall be
fined one hundred dollars ($100).
(3) In the case of a first violation, the permittee shall be notified in
writing of penalties to be levied for further violations.
(4) In the case of a second violation, the permittee shall be fined two
hundred dollars ($200) and shall be notified in writing of penalties to be
levied for further violations. For a violation of section 39-5705, Idaho
Code, the permittee shall not be fined if the permittee can show that a train-
ing program was in place for the employee and that the permittee has a form
signed by that employee on file stating that the employee understands the
alternative nicotine product, tobacco product, or electronic smoking device
laws dealing with minors and the unlawful purchase of alternative nicotine
products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices, but the permit-
tee shall be notified in writing of penalties to be levied for any further vi-
olations. If no such training is in place, the permittee shall be fined two
hundred dollars ($200).
(5) In the case of a third violation in a two (2) year period, the
permittee shall be fined two hundred dollars ($200) and the permit may be
suspended for up to seven (7) days. If the violation is by an employee, at the
same location, who was involved in any previous citation for violation, the
permittee shall be fined four hundred dollars ($400). Effective training
and employment practices by the permittee, as determined by the department,


shall be a mitigating factor in determining permit suspension. Evidence of
mitigating factors shall be submitted to the department within ten (10) days
of the date of violation. Tobacco Alternative nicotine product, tobacco
product, or electronic smoking device retailers must remove all alternative
nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices from all
areas accessible to or visible to the public while the permit is suspended.
(6) In the case of four (4) or more violations within a two (2) year pe-
riod, the permittee shall be fined four hundred dollars ($400) and the per-
mit shall be revoked until such time that the permittee demonstrates an ef-
fective training plan to the department, but in no case shall the revoca-
tion be for less than thirty (30) days. Tobacco Alternative nicotine prod-
uct, tobacco product, or electronic smoking device retailers must remove all
alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking de-
vices from all areas accessible to or visible to the public while the permit
is revoked.
(7) All moneys collected for violations pursuant to this section shall
be remitted to the prevention of minors' access to alternative nicotine
products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices fund created in
section 39-5711, Idaho Code.
(8) All fines shall be paid in full prior to renewal of a permit and
within ten (10) days of the date of the violation.
SECTION 14. That Section 39-5709, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-5709. CRIMINAL PENALTIES FOR VIOLATIONS WITHOUT A PERMIT. Sale or
distribution of alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or elec-
tronic smoking devices, or any violation of this chapter, without a permit is
considered by the state of Idaho as an effort to subvert the state's public
purpose to prevent minor's minors' access to alternative nicotine products,
tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices.
(1) The sale or distribution of alternative nicotine products, tobacco
products, or electronic smoking devices without a permit shall constitute a
misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months in the
county jail, a fine of three hundred dollars ($300), or by both such fine
and imprisonment. If the sale or distribution of alternative nicotine prod-
ucts, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices was to a minor, the
fine shall be no less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thou-
sand dollars ($1,000). The provisions of this section shall not be applica-
ble to an employee of the business engaged in the sale of alternative nico-
tine products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices if the sale
occurred during the course of such employment and the seller does not have an
ownership interest in the business.
(2) In addition to the penalties set forth in subsection (1) of this
section, the court may impose an additional fine of one thousand dollars
($1,000) per day beginning the day following the date of citation as long as
the illegal alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic
smoking devices sales or distribution continues. The first seven (7) days of
additional fines may be suspended, provided that the business or seller is
able to prove that the business or seller has applied for the permit within
seven (7) days of the citation.


SECTION 15. That Section 39-5710, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-5710. CONDUCT OF ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS. (1) It is the intent of the
legislature that law enforcement agencies, the attorney general, and the
department shall enforce this chapter in a manner that can reasonably be
expected to significantly reduce the extent to which alternative nicotine
products, tobacco products, and electronic smoking devices are sold or dis-
tributed to minors.
(2) Law enforcement agencies may conduct random, unannounced inspec-
tions at locations where alternative nicotine products, tobacco products,
or electronic smoking devices are sold or distributed to ensure compliance
with this chapter. A copy of all citations issued under this chapter shall be
submitted to the department.
(3) The department shall conduct at least one (1) random, unannounced
inspection per year at all locations where alternative nicotine products,
tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices are sold or distributed at
retail to ensure compliance with this chapter. The department shall conduct
inspections for minor-exempt permittees without the assistance of a minor.
The department shall conduct inspections for all other permittees with the
assistance of a minor. Each year, the department shall conduct random, unan-
nounced inspections equal to the number of permittees on the last day of the
calendar year multiplied by the violation percentage rate reported for the
previous year multiplied by a factor of ten (10). In no instance will the
number of inspections exceed twice the number of permittees. Local law en-
forcement agencies are encouraged to contract with the department to perform
these required inspections.
(4) Minors may assist with random, unannounced inspections, provided
that minors under the age of eighteen (18) years must have the written con-
sent of a parent or legal guardian. When assisting with these inspections,
minors shall not provide false identification or make any false statement
regarding their age.
(5) Citizens may file a written complaint of noncompliance of this
chapter with the department or with a law enforcement agency. Permit holders
under 26 U.S.C. 5712 may file written complaints relating to delivery sales
to the department or the attorney general's offices. Complaints shall be
investigated and the proper enforcement actions taken.
(6) Within a reasonable time, not later than two (2) business days after
an inspection has occurred, a representative of the business inspected shall
be informed in writing of the results of the inspection.
(7) The attorney general or his designee, or any person who holds a per-
mit under 26 U.S.C. 5712, may bring an action in district court in Idaho to
prevent or restrain violations of this chapter by any person or by any person
controlling such person.
SECTION 16. That Section 39-5711, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-5711. FUNDING AND CREATION OF PREVENTION OF MINORS' ACCESS TO
ALTERNATIVE NICOTINE PRODUCTS, TOBACCO PRODUCTS, OR ELECTRONIC SMOKING
DEVICES FUND. There is hereby created the prevention of minors' access to


alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking de-
vices fund in the state treasury. Moneys in the fund shall be used to fund the
administration, inspections and enforcement of this chapter. Moneys in the
fund may be expended only pursuant to appropriation. The fund shall consist
of:
(1) The current federal funds that are available for inspections or for
the prevention of minors' access to tobacco products or electronic smoking
devices shall be utilized by the department;
(2) The fines from the civil penalties pursuant to section 39-5708,
Idaho Code; and
(3) Moneys from any other source.
SECTION 17. That Section 39-5713, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-5713. LOCAL ORDINANCES PROHIBITED. No local unit of government
may adopt or enforce requirements for the regulation, marketing, or sale of
alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking de-
vices that are more restrictive than or in addition to this chapter. No local
unit of government may impose or enforce a tax or fee on alternative nicotine
products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices. This section
shall not be construed to prevent a local unit of government from regulating
the use of alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic
smoking devices in any public place pursuant to section 39-5511, Idaho Code,
or in any other public outdoor area. Nothing in this section shall preclude
or preempt any local, county, or municipal government from exercising its
lawful authority to regulate zoning or land use.
SECTION 18. That Section 39-5714, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-5714. REQUIREMENTS FOR DELIVERY SALES. (1) No permittee shall make
a delivery sale of alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or elec-
tronic smoking devices to any individual who is under age twenty-one (21)
years in this state.
(2) Each permittee taking a delivery sale order shall comply with: the
age verification requirements set forth in section 39-5715, Idaho Code;
the disclosure and notice requirements set forth in section 39-5716, Idaho
Code; the shipping requirements set forth in section 39-5717, Idaho Code;
the registration and reporting requirements set forth in section 39-5718,
Idaho Code; all tax collection requirements provided by title 63, Idaho
Code; and all other laws of the state of Idaho generally applicable to sales
of alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking
devices that occur entirely within Idaho, including but not limited to those
laws imposing excise taxes, sales and use taxes, licensing and tax stamping
requirements, and escrow or other payment obligations.
SECTION 19. That Section 39-5715, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


39-5715. AGE VERIFICATION REQUIREMENTS. No permittee shall mail or
ship alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking
devices in connection with a delivery sale order unless, before mailing or
shipping such alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or elec-
tronic smoking devices, the permittee accepting the delivery sale order
first obtains from the prospective customer a certification that includes
proof of age that the purchaser is at least twenty-one (21) years old, the
credit or debit card used for payment has been issued in the purchaser's
name, and the address to which the alternative nicotine products, tobacco
products, or electronic smoking devices are being shipped matches the
credit card company's address for the cardholder or employs technology that
requires and authenticates independent, third-party age and identity veri-
fication services, comparing data against third-party sources.
SECTION 20. That Section 39-5717, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-5717. SHIPPING REQUIREMENTS -- TOBACCO PRODUCTS, ALTERNATIVE
NICOTINE PRODUCTS, OR ELECTRONIC SMOKING DEVICES. Each permittee who mails
or ships alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic
smoking devices in connection with a delivery sale order shall include as
part of the shipping documents a clear and conspicuous statement providing
as follows:
ALTERNATIVE NICOTINE PRODUCTS, TOBACCO PRODUCTS, OR ELECTRONIC
SMOKING DEVICES: IDAHO LAW PROHIBITS SHIPPING TO INDIVIDUALS UNDER
THE AGE OF TWENTY-ONE (21) YEARS AND REQUIRES THE PAYMENT OF TAXES
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 25, TITLE 63, IDAHO CODE. PERSONS VIOLATING
THIS LAW MAY BE CIVILLY AND CRIMINALLY LIABLE.
Anyone who delivers any such container distributes alternative nico-
tine products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices as defined in
section 39-5702(5) 39-5702(6), Idaho Code, and is subject to the terms and
requirements of this chapter. If a permittee taking a delivery sale order
also delivers the alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or elec-
tronic smoking devices without using a third-party delivery service, the
permittee shall comply with all the requirements of vendor-assisted sales as
defined in section 39-5702(17) 39-5702, Idaho Code.
SECTION 21. That Section 39-5718, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-5718. REGISTRATION AND REPORTING REQUIREMENTS. (1) Prior to making
delivery sales or shipping alternative nicotine products, tobacco products,
or electronic smoking devices in connection with any such sales, every busi-
ness shall obtain a permit from the department and file with the state tax
commission a statement setting forth the permittee's name, trade name, and
the address of the business's principal place of business and any other place
of business.
(2) No later than the tenth day of each calendar month, each permit-
tee that has made a delivery sale or shipped or delivered alternative nico-
tine products, tobacco products, or electronic smoking devices in connec-
tion with any such sale during the previous calendar month shall file with


the department and the state tax commission a memorandum or a copy of the in-
voice that provides for each and every such delivery sale:
(a) The name and address of the individual to whom the delivery sale was
made;
(b) The brand or brands of the alternative nicotine products, tobacco
products, or electronic smoking devices that were sold in such delivery
sale; and
(c) The quantity of alternative nicotine products, tobacco products,
or electronic smoking devices that were sold in such delivery sale.
(3) Any alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or electronic
smoking devices sold or attempted to be sold in a delivery sale that does
not meet the requirements of this chapter shall be forfeited to the state of
Idaho.
SECTION 22. That Section 39-8421, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-8421. DEFINITIONS. As used in sections 39-8420 through 39-8425,
Idaho Code:
(1) The definitions set forth in section 39-8402, Idaho Code, of the
Idaho tobacco master settlement agreement complementary act, and in this
section, apply to sections 39-8420 through 39-8425, Idaho Code.
(2) "Cigarette rolling machine" means any machine or device that has
the capability to produce at least one hundred fifty (150) cigarettes in less
than thirty (30) minutes.
(3) "Cigarette rolling machine operator" means any person who owns or
leases or otherwise has available for use a cigarette rolling machine and
makes such a machine available for use by another person in a commercial
setting in order to manufacture a cigarette. No person shall be deemed a
cigarette rolling machine operator based solely upon that person's manufac-
ture, sale, enabling, disabling, or repair of a cigarette rolling machine.
(4) "Minor" has the same meaning as that term is defined in section
39-5702(7) 39-5702, Idaho Code.
(5) "Person" means natural persons, corporations both foreign and do-
mestic, trusts, partnerships both limited and general, incorporated or un-
incorporated associations, companies, business entities, and any other le-
gal entity, or any other group associated in fact although not a legal en-
tity.
(6) "Tobacco products" means any substance that contains tobacco,
including but not limited to cigarettes, cigars, pipes, snuff, smoking to-
bacco, tobacco papers, or smokeless tobacco.
SECTION 23. That Section 56-227F, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-227F. PUBLIC ASSISTANCE BENEFIT CARDS -- PROHIBITED USES. (1) Any
recipient of public assistance is prohibited from using public assistance
benefit cards or cash obtained with public assistance benefit cards:
(a) For the purpose of participating in any of the activities described
under chapters 38 and 49, title 18, Idaho Code, or authorized pursuant
to any state-tribal gaming compact under section 67-429A, Idaho Code;


(b) For the purpose of pari-mutuel betting authorized under chapter 25,
title 54, Idaho Code;
(c) To purchase lottery tickets or shares authorized under chapter 74,
title 67, Idaho Code;
(d) For the purpose of participating in or purchasing tattoo, branding
or body piercing services as defined in section 18-1523, Idaho Code;
(e) To purchase cigarettes as defined in section 39-7802(d), Idaho
Code, or tobacco products or electronic smoking devices as defined in
section 39-5702(15) 39-5702, Idaho Code;
(f) To purchase any items regulated under title 23, Idaho Code;
(g) For the purpose of adult entertainment at venues with performances
that contain sexually oriented material where minors under the age of
eighteen (18) years are prohibited; or
(h) For the purpose of purchasing or participating in any activities in
any location listed in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The following businesses are required to comply with the provisions
of this section:
(a) Any establishment or business licensed under chapter 9, title 23,
Idaho Code;
(b) State liquor stores defined under section 23-902, Idaho Code, with
the exception of special distributors as referenced in chapter 3, title
23, Idaho Code;
(c) Any business or agency that issues or underwrites bail bonds as de-
fined in section 41-1038(3), Idaho Code;
(d) Gambling establishments licensed under Idaho law;
(e) Any business or establishment that offers tattoo, body piercing or
branding services as defined in section 18-1523, Idaho Code;
(f) Adult entertainment venues with performances that contain sexually
oriented material where minors under the age of eighteen (18) years are
prohibited; and
(g) Any establishment where persons under the age of eighteen (18)
years are not permitted.
(3) The department shall notify any business determined to be in viola-
tion of the provisions of subsection (2) of this section and the licensing
authority of any such business, if applicable, that such business has con-
tinued to allow the use of a public assistance benefit card in violation of
subsection (2) of this section. The department may require the Idaho quest
electronic benefits transfer (EBT) card business identification number
(BIN) be disabled at any business found to be in violation of subsection (2)
of this section. Any business in violation of subsection (2) of this section
may also be required to deny all public assistance cash transactions made
with an Idaho quest EBT card at any automated teller machine (ATM) located
in their establishment. All costs associated with disabling the BIN and ATM
will be the responsibility of such business owner.
(4) Only the recipient, an eligible member of the recipient's house-
hold or the recipient's authorized representative may use a public assis-
tance benefit card or the benefit, and such use shall only be for the re-
spective benefit program purposes. The recipient shall not sell, attempt to
sell, exchange or donate a public assistance benefit card or any benefits to
any other person or entity.


(5) A violation of subsection (1) or (4) of this section by a recipient
constitutes a misdemeanor.
(a) The department shall notify all recipients of public assistance
benefit cards that any violation of subsection (1) or (4) of this sec-
tion could result in legal proceedings and forfeiture of all cash public
assistance.
(b) Whenever the department has confirmed that a person has violated
subsection (1) or (4) of this section, the department shall notify the
person in writing that the violation could result in legal proceedings
and forfeiture of all cash public assistance.
(6) As used in this section, "public assistance" or "public assistance
benefit" means benefits provided to a recipient pursuant to the temporary
assistance for families in Idaho (TAFI) program on an Idaho quest EBT card
account.
(7) This section shall be enforced by the director of the department of
health and welfare in cooperation with local law enforcement and prosecuting
agencies.
SECTION 24. That the Heading for Chapter 25, Title 63, Idaho Code, be,
and the same is hereby amended to read as follows:
CHAPTER 25
CIGARETTE, NICOTINE, AND TOBACCO PRODUCTS TAXES
SECTION 25. That Section 63-2551, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2551. TOBACCO AND NICOTINE PRODUCTS TAX -- DEFINITIONS. As used in
this act:
(1) "Tobacco products" shall mean any cigars, cheroots, stogies,
smoking tobacco (including granulated, plug, cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed
and any other kinds and forms of tobacco suitable for smoking in a pipe or
cigarette), chewing tobacco (including cavendish, twist, plug, scrap and
any other kinds and forms of tobacco suitable for chewing) and snuff, however
prepared; and shall include any other articles or products made of tobacco
except cigarettes;
(2) "Manufacturer" means a person who manufactures and sells tobacco
products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products;
(3) "Distributor" means (a) any person engaged in the business of sell-
ing tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products in
this state who brings, or causes to be brought, into this state from without
the state any tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor
products for sale, (b) any person who makes, manufactures, or fabricates
tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products in this
state for sale in this state, (c) any person engaged in the business of
selling tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products
without this state who ships or transports tobacco products, alternative
nicotine products, or vapor products to retailers in this state, to be sold
by those retailers;
(4) "Subjobber" means any person, other than a manufacturer or distrib-
utor, who buys tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor


products from a distributor and sells them to persons other than the ultimate
consumers;
(5) "Retailer" means any person engaged in the business of selling to-
bacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products to ulti-
mate consumers;
(6) "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, or barter, in any manner or by
any means whatsoever, for a consideration, and includes and means all sales
made by any person. It includes a gift by a person engaged in the business of
selling tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products,
for advertising, as a means of evading the provisions of this chapter, or for
any other purposes whatsoever;
(7) "Wholesale sales price" means the established price for which a
manufacturer or any person sells a tobacco product, alternative nicotine
product, or vapor product to a distributor that is not a related person as de-
fined in section 267 of the Internal Revenue Code, exclusive of any discount
or other reduction;
(8) "Business" means any trade, occupation, activity, or enterprise
engaged in for the purpose of selling or distributing tobacco products, al-
ternative nicotine products, or vapor products in this state;
(9) "Place of business" means any place where tobacco products, alter-
native nicotine products, or vapor products are manufactured, stored, or
kept for the purpose of sale or consumption, including any vessel, vehicle,
airplane or train;
(10) "Retail outlet" means each place of business from which tobacco
products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products are sold to con-
sumers;
(11) "Commission" means the Idaho state tax commission.
(12) "Alternative nicotine product" means a noncombustible product
that contains nicotine, whether natural or synthetic, but does not contain
tobacco and is intended for human consumption, whether chewed, absorbed,
dissolved, ingested, or by other means. This term shall not include a vapor
product or any product regulated by the United States food and drug adminis-
tration under chapter V of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act.
(13) "Electronic smoking device" has the same meaning as that term is
defined in section 39-5702, Idaho Code.
(14) "Vapor product" means any liquid, substance, or mixture, whether
or not containing nicotine, that is designed, manufactured, or marketed for
use in an electronic smoking device to produce vapor, including any pre-
filled cartridge, pod, vapor solution, vapor cartridge, or other container
of liquid or other form that is intended to be used with or in an electronic
cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or sim-
ilar product or device. The term does not include any product regulated by
the United States food and drug administration under chapter V of the federal
food, drug, and cosmetic act.
SECTION 26. That Section 63-2552B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
63-2552B. TOBACCO PRODUCTS, ALTERNATIVE NICOTINE PRODUCTS, AND VAPOR
PRODUCTS USE TAX. Any person who does not hold a tobacco products tax permit
who possesses, purchases or consumes tobacco products, alternative nicotine


products, or vapor products upon which tax imposed by this chapter has not
been paid, including tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or
vapor products sold by internet, catalog, telephone and facsimile sell-
ers, is liable for the taxes imposed by sections 63-2552, and 63-2552A, and
63-2552C, Idaho Code, to be reported and paid as required in section 63-2560,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 27. That Chapter 25, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-2552C, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-2552C. TAX ON THE SALE OF ALTERNATIVE NICOTINE PRODUCTS AND VAPOR
PRODUCTS -- DISTRIBUTION. (1) There is hereby imposed an excise tax on vapor
products sold in the state of Idaho. Such tax shall be at the rate of five
cents (5¢) per fluid milliliter of vapor products. All invoices for any va-
por product issued by manufacturers shall state the amount of consumable va-
por product in milliliters. The distributor shall be liable for the payment
of the tax imposed by this subsection. The tax shall be imposed at the time
the distributor:
(a) Brings or causes to be brought into this state vapor products for
sale;
(b) Manufactures vapor products in this state for sale; or
(c) Ships or transports vapor products to retailers in this state to be
sold by those retailers.
(2) There is hereby imposed an excise tax on alternative nicotine prod-
ucts sold in the state of Idaho. Such tax shall be at the rate of twenty-five
cents (25¢) per container of alternative nicotine products that contains at
least one (1) and not more than twenty (20) units, and for any container that
includes more than twenty (20) units, at the rate of twenty-five cents (25¢)
per container plus a proportionate tax at the like rate on each unit in excess
of twenty (20) units. The distributor shall be liable for the payment of the
tax imposed by this subsection. The tax shall be imposed at the time the dis-
tributor:
(a) Brings or causes to be brought into this state alternative nicotine
products for sale;
(b) Manufactures alternative nicotine products in this state for sale;
or
(c) Ships or transports alternative nicotine products to retailers in
this state to be sold by those retailers.
(3) A retailer who brings, or causes to be brought, into this state from
outside the state alternative nicotine products or vapor products for sale
on which the tax has not been paid is responsible for payment of the tax at
the time of receiving such products and before selling such products to the
ultimate consumer.
(4) Revenues received from the taxes imposed by this section shall be
distributed by the state tax commission as follows:
(a) Fifty percent (50%) shall be distributed to the department of
health and welfare for adult and children's behavioral health programs;
(b) Twenty-five percent (25%) shall be distributed to the public school
income fund for the purposes of safe and drug free schools and include


purposes of prevention and cessation, behavioral health, and the hiring
of personnel necessary to respond to the use of nicotine products; and
(c) Twenty-five (25%) shall be distributed to the general fund.
SECTION 28. That Section 63-2553, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2553. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent and purpose of this
chapter to levy a tax on all tobacco products, alternative nicotine prod-
ucts, and vapor products sold, used, consumed, handled, or distributed
within this state and to collect the tax from the distributor as defined in
section 63-2551, Idaho Code. It is the further intent and purpose of this
chapter to impose the tax only once but nothing in this chapter shall be con-
strued to exempt any person taxable under any other law or under any other tax
imposed by the state of Idaho.
SECTION 29. That Section 63-2554, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2554. PERMIT REQUIRED. (1) No person shall engage in the business
of a manufacturer, distributor, or subjobber of tobacco products, alterna-
tive nicotine products, or vapor products at any place of business without
first having received from the commission a permit as provided in section
63-2503 or 63-2504, Idaho Code.
(2) Distributors and subjobbers shall purchase tobacco products, al-
ternative nicotine products, or vapor products only from a manufacturer,
wholesaler, or distributor who has obtained a permit under this chapter or
under chapter 57, title 39, Idaho Code, as appropriate, and shall verify that
the seller holds a valid permit before making a purchase.
(3) Retailers shall purchase alternative nicotine products, tobacco
products, or vapor products only from a wholesaler or distributor who has ob-
tained a permit under this chapter or under chapter 57, title 39, Idaho Code,
as appropriate, and shall verify that the seller holds a valid permit before
making a purchase.
(4) Manufacturers shall sell alternative nicotine products, tobacco
products, or vapor products only to a wholesaler, subjobber, or distributor
who has obtained a permit under this chapter or under chapter 57, title 39,
Idaho Code, as appropriate, and shall verify that the purchaser holds a valid
permit before making a sale.
(5) Wholesalers, subjobbers, and distributors shall sell alternative
nicotine products, tobacco products, or vapor products only to a wholesaler,
subjobber, distributor, or retailer who has obtained a permit under this
chapter or under chapter 57, title 39, Idaho Code, as appropriate, and shall
verify that the purchaser holds a valid permit before making a sale.
(6) The state tax commission shall publish a list of active permits and
shall update such list monthly. The state tax commission also shall publish
a list of persons whose permits have been suspended or revoked, including the
date of the suspension and the date of the anticipated reinstatement or the
date of the revocation.


SECTION 30. That Section 63-2555, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2555. BOOKS AND RECORDS TO BE PRESERVED -- ENTRY AND INSPECTION BY
COMMISSION. (1) Every distributor shall keep at each registered place of
business complete and accurate records for that place of business, including
itemized invoices, of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, and
vapor products held, purchased, manufactured, brought in or caused to be
brought in from without the state, or shipped or transported to retailers
in this state, and of all sales of tobacco products, alternative nicotine
products, and vapor products made, except sales to the ultimate consumer.
(2) These records shall show the names and addresses of purchasers, the
inventory of all tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, and vapor
products on hand on July 1, 1972, July 1, 2026, and other pertinent papers and
documents relating to the purchase, sale or disposition of tobacco products,
alternative nicotine products, and vapor products.
(3) When a registered distributor sells tobacco products, alternative
nicotine products, or vapor products exclusively to the ultimate consumer
at the address given in the certificate, no invoice of those sales shall
be required, but itemized invoices shall be made of all tobacco products,
alternative nicotine products, and vapor products transferred to other re-
tail outlets owned or controlled by that registered distributor. All books,
records, and other papers and documents required by this section to be kept
shall be preserved for a period of at least five (5) years after the date of
the documents, as aforesaid, or the date of the entries thereof appearing in
the records, unless the commission, in writing, authorizes their destruc-
tion or disposal at an earlier date. At any time during usual business hours,
the commission, or its duly authorized agents or employees, may enter any
place of business of a distributor, without a search warrant, and inspect
the premises, the records required to be kept under this chapter, and the to-
bacco products, alternative nicotine products, and vapor products contained
therein, to determine whether or not all the provisions of this chapter are
being fully complied with. If the commission, or any of its agents or employ-
ees, is denied free access or is hindered or interfered with in making such
examination, the permit of the distributor at such premises shall be subject
to revocation by the commission.
SECTION 31. That Section 63-2556, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2556. PRESERVATION OF INVOICES OF SALES TO OTHER THAN ULTIMATE CON-
SUMER. Every person who sells tobacco products, alternative nicotine prod-
ucts, or vapor products to persons other than the ultimate consumer shall
render with each sale itemized invoices showing the seller's name and ad-
dress, the purchaser's name and address, the date of sale, and all prices and
discounts. He shall preserve legible copies of all such invoices for five
(5) years from the date of sale.
SECTION 32. That Section 63-2557, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


63-2557. INVOICES OF PURCHASES TO BE PROCURED BY RETAILER, SUBJOBBER
-- PRESERVATION -- INSPECTION. Every retailer and subjobber shall procure
itemized invoices of all tobacco products, alternative nicotine products,
and vapor products purchased. The invoices shall show the name and address
of the seller and the date of purchase. The retailer and subjobber shall pre-
serve a legible copy of each such invoice for five (5) years from the date of
purchase. Invoices shall be available for inspection by the commission or
its authorized agents or employees at the retailer's or subjobber's place of
business.
SECTION 33. That Section 63-2558, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2558. RECORDS OF SHIPMENTS, DELIVERIES FROM PUBLIC WAREHOUSE OF
FIRST DESTINATION -- PRESERVATION -- INSPECTION. Records of all deliveries
or shipments of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor
products from any public warehouse of first destination in this state shall
be kept by the warehouse and be available to the commission for inspection.
They shall show the name and address of the consignee, the date, the quan-
tity of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, and vapor products
delivered, and such other information as the commission may require. These
records shall be preserved for five (5) years from the date of delivery of the
tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products.
SECTION 34. That Section 63-2559, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2559. WHEN CREDIT MAY BE OBTAINED FOR TAX PAID. (1) Where tobacco
products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products upon which
the tax taxes imposed by this chapter has have been reported and paid, are
shipped or transported by the distributor to distributors or retailers
outside the state, to be sold by those distributors or retailers, or are
returned to the manufacturer by the distributor or destroyed by the distrib-
utor, credit of such tax taxes may be made to the distributor in accordance
with rules prescribed by the commission.
(2) Taxes paid on tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or
vapor products sold on or after January 1, 2000, on accounts later found to be
worthless and actually charged-off may be credited upon a subsequent payment
of the tax taxes on tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, and va-
por products or, if no such tax is taxes are due, refunded. If all or part
of such an account is thereafter collected, the tax taxes shall be paid based
upon the proportion of the amount collected.
SECTION 35. That Section 63-2563, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2563. COLLECTION AND ENFORCEMENT. The collection and enforcement
procedures provided by the Idaho income tax act, sections 63-3038, 63-3039,
63-3040, 63-3042 through 63-3045B, 63-3047 through 63-3065A, 63-3068,
63-3071, 63-3075 and 63-3078, Idaho Code, shall apply and be available to
the state tax commission for the enforcement of this act and collection of


any amounts due under this act and said sections shall, for this purpose,
be considered part of this act and wherever liens or any other proceedings
are defined as income tax liens or proceedings, they shall, when applied in
enforcement or collection under this act, be described as tobacco products,
alternative nicotine products, and vapor products tax liens and proceed-
ings. Any reference to taxable year in the income tax act shall be, for the
purposes of this act, considered a taxable period.
The state tax commission may be made a party defendant in an action at
law or in equity by any person aggrieved by the unlawful seizure or sale of
his property, or in any suit for refund or to recover an overpayment, but
only the state of Idaho shall be responsible for any final judgment secured
against the state tax commission, and said judgment shall be paid or satis-
fied out of the tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, and vapor
products tax refund fund.
SECTION 36. That Section 63-2565, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2565. REFUNDS, LIMITATIONS, INTEREST. (a) Where there has been an
overpayment of any tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, and va-
por products tax imposed by this act, the amount of such overpayment shall be
credited against any tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, and
vapor products tax then due from the taxpayer, and any balance of such excess
shall be refunded to the taxpayer.
(b) The state tax commission is authorized and the state board of tax
appeals is authorized to order the tax commission in proper cases to credit
or remit, refund, and pay back all taxes and penalties erroneously or ille-
gally assessed or collected, regardless of whether the same have been paid
under protest, which claims for refund shall be certified to the state board
of examiners by the state tax commission.
(c) No such credit or refund of taxes, penalties or interest paid, shall
be allowed or made after three (3) years from the time the return was filed,
unless before the expiration of such period a claim therefor is filed by the
taxpayer with the commission.
(d) Interest shall be allowed on the amount of such credits or refunds
at the rate provided in section 63-3045, Idaho Code, from the date such tax
was paid.
(e) Appeal of a tax commission decision denying in whole or part a claim
for refund shall be made in accordance with and within the time limits pre-
scribed in section 63-3049, Idaho Code.
SECTION 37. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.